Wisconsin, session 2025, SB190.
do enact as follows:SB190,11Section 1. 14.832 of the statutes is created to read:SB190,2,8214.832 Respiratory care interstate compact. There is created a 3respiratory care interstate compact commission as specified in s. 448.9886. The 4commissioner on the commission representing this state shall be appointed by the 5medical examining board as provided in s. 448.9886 (7) (b) 1., with the advice of the 6respiratory care practitioners examining council, and shall be an individual 7described in s. 448.9886 (7) (b) 2. The commission has the powers and duties 8granted and imposed under s. 448.9886.SB190,29Section 2. 146.81 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB190,2,1210146.81 (1) (d) A physician, perfusionist, or respiratory care practitioner 11licensed or certified under subch. II of ch. 448 or a respiratory care practitioner who 12holds a compact privilege under subch. XIV of ch. 448.SB190,313Section 3. 146.997 (1) (d) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:SB190,2,1514146.997 (1) (d) 5. A respiratory care practitioner licensed or who is certified 15under ch. 448 or who holds a compact privilege under subch. XIV of ch. 448.SB190,41Section 4. 256.15 (4) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB190,3,62256.15 (4) (a) 3. If the ambulance is an aircraft and the sick, disabled, or 3injured individual is a pediatric patient who is being transferred from one hospital 4to another hospital, one individual specified in subd. 1. plus one respiratory care 5practitioner who is certified under subch. II of ch. 448 or who holds a compact 6privilege under subch. XIV of ch. 448.SB190,57Section 5. 440.03 (9) (a) (intro.) and 2. of the statutes are amended to read:SB190,3,128440.03 (9) (a) (intro.) Subject to pars. (b) and (c) and s. 458.33 (2) (b) and (5), 9the department shall, biennially, determine each fee for an initial credential for 10which no examination is required, for a reciprocal credential, and for a credential 11renewal and any fees imposed under ss. 447.51 (2), 448.986 (2), 448.9875 (2), 12448.9885 (2), 448.9887 (2), 457.51 (2), and 459.71 (2) by doing all of the following:SB190,4,3132. Not later than January 31 of each odd-numbered year, adjusting for the 14succeeding fiscal biennium each fee for an initial credential for which an 15examination is not required, for a reciprocal credential, and, subject to s. 440.08 (2) 16(a), for a credential renewal, and any fees imposed under ss. 447.51 (2), 448.986 (2), 17448.9875 (2), 448.9885 (2), 448.9887 (2), 457.51 (2), and 459.71 (2), if an adjustment 18is necessary to reflect the approximate administrative and enforcement costs of the 19department that are attributable to the regulation of the particular occupation or 20business during the period in which the initial or reciprocal credential, credential 21renewal, or compact privilege is in effect and, for purposes of each fee for a 22credential renewal, to reflect an estimate of any additional moneys available for the 23department’s general program operations as a result of appropriation transfers that 24have been or are estimated to be made under s. 20.165 (1) (i) during the fiscal 1biennium in progress at the time of the deadline for an adjustment under this 2subdivision or during the fiscal biennium beginning on the July 1 immediately 3following the deadline for an adjustment under this subdivision.SB190,64Section 6. 440.03 (11m) (c) 2rm. of the statutes is created to read:SB190,4,75440.03 (11m) (c) 2rm. The coordinated data system under s. 448.9886 (8), if 6such disclosure is required under the respiratory care interstate compact under s. 7448.9886.SB190,78Section 7. 440.03 (13) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB190,4,179440.03 (13) (b) (intro.) The department may investigate whether an applicant 10for or holder of any of the following credentials has been charged with or convicted 11of a crime only pursuant to rules promulgated by the department under this 12paragraph, including rules that establish the criteria that the department will use 13to determine whether an investigation under this paragraph is necessary, except as 14provided in par. (c) and ss. 441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 15448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 5. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 448.9886 (3) 16(a) 9., 455.50 (3) (e) 4. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., and 459.70 (3) (b) 172.:SB190,818Section 8. 440.03 (13) (c) 1. m. of the statutes is created to read:SB190,4,2019440.03 (13) (c) 1. m. An applicant for a respiratory care practitioner certificate 20under s. 448.04 (1) (i).SB190,921Section 9. 440.15 of the statutes is amended to read:SB190,5,422440.15 No fingerprinting. Except as provided under ss. 440.03 (13) (c), 23441.51 (5) (a) 5., 447.50 (3) (a) 5., 448.980 (5) (b) 3., 448.985 (3) (a) 4., 448.987 (3) (a) 245. a. and (5) (b) 2. a., 448.988 (3) (a) 5., 448.9886 (3) (a) 9., 450.071 (3) (c) 9., 450.075 1(3) (c) 9., 455.50 (3) (e) 4. and (f) 4., 457.50 (3) (b) 3. and (5) (b) 2. a., and 459.70 (3) 2(b) 1., the department or a credentialing board may not require that an applicant for 3a credential or a credential holder be fingerprinted or submit fingerprints in 4connection with the department’s or the credentialing board’s credentialing.SB190,105Section 10. 448.01 (9s) of the statutes is amended to read:SB190,5,96448.01 (9s) “Scene of an emergency” means an area not within the confines of 7a hospital or other institution which has hospital facilities or the office of a person 8licensed, certified or holding a compact privilege or limited permit under this 9chapter.SB190,1110Section 11. 448.01 (12) of the statutes is amended to read:SB190,5,1611448.01 (12) “Warn” means to privately apprise the holder of a license or, 12certificate, or compact privilege of the unprofessional nature of the holder’s conduct 13and admonish the holder that continued or repeated conduct of such nature may 14give the medical examining board or an attached affiliated credentialing board 15cause to reprimand the holder or to limit, suspend or revoke such license or, 16certificate, or compact privilege.SB190,1217Section 12. 448.015 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB190,5,2018448.015 (2m) “Respiratory care compact privilege” means a compact 19privilege, as defined in s. 448.9886 (2) (h), that is granted under the respiratory 20care interstate compact to an individual to practice in this state.SB190,1321Section 13. 448.02 (3) (a) to (c), (e), (f) and (h) of the statutes are amended to 22read:SB190,6,1823448.02 (3) (a) The board shall investigate allegations of unprofessional 24conduct and negligence in treatment by persons holding a license or, certificate, or 1respiratory care compact privilege granted by the board. An allegation that a 2physician has violated s. 253.10 (3), 448.30 or 450.13 (2) or has failed to mail or 3present a medical certification required under s. 69.18 (2) within 21 days after the 4pronouncement of death of the person who is the subject of the required certificate 5or that a physician has failed at least 6 times within a 6-month period to mail or 6present a medical certificate required under s. 69.18 (2) within 6 days after the 7pronouncement of death of the person who is the subject of the required certificate 8is an allegation of unprofessional conduct. Information contained in reports filed 9with the board under s. 49.45 (2) (a) 12r., 50.36 (3) (b), 609.17 or 632.715, or under 1042 CFR 1001.2005, shall be investigated by the board. Information contained in a 11report filed with the board under s. 655.045 (1), as created by 1985 Wisconsin Act 1229, which is not a finding of negligence or in a report filed with the board under s. 1350.36 (3) (c) may, within the discretion of the board, be used as the basis of an 14investigation of a person named in the report. The board may require a person 15holding a license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege to undergo 16and may consider the results of one or more physical, mental or professional 17competency examinations if the board believes that the results of any such 18examinations may be useful to the board in conducting its investigation.SB190,7,1519(b) After an investigation, if the board finds that there is probable cause to 20believe that the person is guilty of unprofessional conduct or negligence in 21treatment, the board shall hold a hearing on such conduct. The board may use any 22information obtained by the board or the department under s. 655.17 (7) (b), as 23created by 1985 Wisconsin Act 29, in an investigation or a disciplinary proceeding, 24including a public disciplinary proceeding, conducted under this subsection and the 1board may require a person holding a license or, certificate, or respiratory care 2compact privilege to undergo and may consider the results of one or more physical, 3mental or professional competency examinations if the board believes that the 4results of any such examinations may be useful to the board in conducting its 5hearing. A unanimous finding by a panel established under s. 655.02, 1983 stats., 6or a finding by a court that a physician has acted negligently in treating a patient is 7conclusive evidence that the physician is guilty of negligence in treatment. A 8finding that is not a unanimous finding by a panel established under s. 655.02, 1983 9stats., that a physician has acted negligently in treating a patient is presumptive 10evidence that the physician is guilty of negligence in treatment. A certified copy of 11the findings of fact, conclusions of law and order of the panel or the order of a court 12is presumptive evidence that the finding of negligence in treatment was made. The 13board shall render a decision within 90 days after the date on which the hearing is 14held or, if subsequent proceedings are conducted under s. 227.46 (2), within 90 days 15after the date on which those proceedings are completed.SB190,8,416(c) Subject to par. (cm), after a disciplinary hearing, the board may, when it 17determines that a panel established under s. 655.02, 1983 stats., has unanimously 18found or a court has found that a person has been negligent in treating a patient or 19when it finds a person guilty of unprofessional conduct or negligence in treatment, 20do one or more of the following: warn or reprimand that person, or limit, suspend or 21revoke any license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege granted by 22the board to that person. The board may condition the removal of limitations on a 23license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege or the restoration of a 24suspended or revoked license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege 1upon obtaining minimum results specified by the board on one or more physical, 2mental or professional competency examinations if the board believes that 3obtaining the minimum results is related to correcting one or more of the bases 4upon which the limitation, suspension or revocation was imposed.SB190,8,145(e) A person whose license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege 6is limited under this subchapter shall be permitted to continue practice upon 7condition that the person will refrain from engaging in unprofessional conduct; that 8the person will appear before the board or its officers or agents at such times and 9places as may be designated by the board from time to time; that the person will 10fully disclose to the board or its officers or agents the nature of the person’s practice 11and conduct; that the person will fully comply with the limits placed on his or her 12practice and conduct by the board; that the person will obtain additional training, 13education or supervision required by the board; and that the person will cooperate 14with the board.SB190,8,2315(f) Unless a suspended license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact 16privilege is revoked during the period of suspension, upon the expiration of the 17period of suspension the license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege 18shall again become operative and effective. However, the board may require the 19holder of any such suspended license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact 20privilege to pass the examinations required for the original grant of the license or, 21certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege before allowing such suspended 22license or, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege again to become 23operative and effective.SB190,9,424(h) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the board, in its discretion, from 1investigating and conducting disciplinary proceedings on allegations of 2unprofessional conduct by persons holding a license or, certificate, or respiratory 3care compact privilege granted by the board when the allegations of unprofessional 4conduct may also constitute allegations of negligence in treatment.SB190,145Section 14. 448.02 (3) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2023 Wisconsin Act 6172 and 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), is repealed and recreated to read:SB190,9,247448.02 (3) (a) The board shall investigate allegations of unprofessional 8conduct and negligence in treatment by persons holding a license, certificate, or 9respiratory care compact privilege granted by the board. An allegation that a 10physician has violated s. 253.10 (3), 448.30 or 450.13 (2) or has failed to present a 11medical certification required under s. 69.18 (2) within 21 days after the 12pronouncement of death of the person who is the subject of the required certificate 13or that a physician has failed at least 6 times within a 6-month period to present a 14medical certificate required under s. 69.18 (2) within 6 days after the 15pronouncement of death of the person who is the subject of the required certificate 16is an allegation of unprofessional conduct. Information contained in reports filed 17with the board under s. 49.45 (2) (a) 12r., 50.36 (3) (b), 609.17 or 632.715, or under 1842 CFR 1001.2005, shall be investigated by the board. Information contained in a 19report filed with the board under s. 655.045 (1), as created by 1985 Wisconsin Act 2029, which is not a finding of negligence or in a report filed with the board under s. 2150.36 (3) (c) may, within the discretion of the board, be used as the basis of an 22investigation of a person named in the report. The board may require a person 23holding a license, certificate, or respiratory care compact privilege to undergo and 24may consider the results of one or more physical, mental or professional competency 1examinations if the board believes that the results of any such examinations may be 2useful to the board in conducting its investigation. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb190 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb190 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB190 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB190 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB190: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting